Nevada, session 83, AB524.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 482.053 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.053 For the purposes of regulation under this chapter and
of imposing tort liability under NRS 41.440, and for no other
purpose:
1. “Lease” means a contract by which the lienholder or owner
of a vehicle transfers to another person, for compensation, the right
to use such vehicle but does not include [the] :
(a) The sharing of a vehicle through a peer-to-peer car sharing
program pursuant to chapter 482C of NRS.
(b) The providing of special services, as defined in section 3 of
this act, by a common motor carrier who is authorized to provide
those services by the Nevada Transportation Authority.
2. “Long-term lessee” means a person who has leased a vehicle
from another person for a fixed period of more than 31 days.
3. “Long-term lessor” means a person who has leased a vehicle
to another person for a fixed period of more than 31 days.
4. “Short-term lessee” means a person who has leased a vehicle
from another person for a period of 31 days or less, or by the day, or
by the trip.
5. “Short-term lessor” means a person who has leased a vehicle
to another person for a period of 31 days or less, or by the day, or by
the trip.
-
*AB524*

– 3 –
Sec. 2. NRS 482.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.300 1. It is unlawful for any person to engage in the
activities of a short-term lessor unless such person has been licensed
pursuant to NRS 482.363.
2. [A] The following persons shall not be deemed to be
engaged in the activities of a short-term lessor:
(a) A peer-to-peer car sharing program licensed pursuant to
NRS 482C.295 . [and a]
(b) A shared vehicle owner, as defined in NRS 482C.200 . [,
shall not be deemed to be engaged in the activities of a short-term
lessor.]
(c) A common motor carrier who is authorized by the Nevada
Transportation Authority to provide special services, as defined in
section 3 of this act.
Sec. 3. Chapter 706 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Authority shall adopt regulations establishing
circumstances under which a common motor carrier that provides
special services may deviate, without the approval of the Authority,
from the otherwise applicable terms of the permit issued to the
carrier to provide such services or the generally applicable
regulations of the Authority governing common motor carriers
which would otherwise be applicable to such services. In adopting
such regulations, the Authority shall authorize unapproved
deviations which the Authority determines are unlikely, even with
reduced oversight from the Authority, to undermine the safety and
welfare of the traveling public.
2. As used in this section, “special services” means the
transportation of persons who have acquired the use of a vehicle
for a special event, or for a specific purpose as approved by the
Authority, between definite points of origin and destination, at a
per capita rate. The term does not include charter services by bus,
charter services by limousine, scenic tours or airport transfer
services.
Sec. 4. NRS 706.462 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.462 1. A person shall not drive a charter bus for the
purposes of charter bus transportation, a motor vehicle for a fully
regulated carrier of passengers or a taxicab motor carrier as an
employee, independent contractor or lessee unless the person has
been issued a driver’s permit by the Authority pursuant to this
section.
2. The Authority shall issue a driver’s permit to each applicant
who satisfies the requirements of this section. Before issuing a
driver’s permit, the Authority shall:
-
*AB524*

– 4 –
(a) [Require] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4,
require the applicant to submit a complete set of his or her
fingerprints, which the Authority shall forward to the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to ascertain whether the
applicant has a criminal record and the nature of any such record,
and may further investigate the applicant’s background; and
(b) Require proof that the applicant is employed or under a
contract or lease agreement or has an offer of employment, a
contract or a lease agreement that is contingent on the applicant
obtaining a driver’s permit pursuant to this section and:
(1) Has a valid license issued pursuant to NRS 483.340
which authorizes the applicant to drive in this State any motor
vehicle that is within the scope of the employment, contract or lease;
or
(2) If the driver is a resident of a state other than Nevada, has
a valid license issued by the state in which he or she resides which
authorizes the applicant to drive any motor vehicle that is within the
scope of the employment, contract or lease.
3. The Authority may refuse to issue a driver’s permit if:
(a) The applicant has been convicted of:
(1) A felony, other than a sexual offense, in this State or any
other jurisdiction within the 5 years immediately preceding the date
of the application;
(2) A felony involving any sexual offense in this State or any
other jurisdiction at any time before the date of the application; or
(3) A violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.430 or a law of
any other jurisdiction that prohibits the same or similar conduct
within the 3 years immediately preceding the date of the application.
(b) After further investigation into the applicant’s background, if
any, the Authority determines that the issuance of the driver’s
permit would be detrimental to public health, welfare or safety.
4. An applicant for a driver’s permit is not required to submit
fingerprints pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 2 if the
applicant is a person who is registered with the Federal Motor
Carrier Safety Administration and the applicant submits with his
or her application an active USDOT number issued by the United
States Department of Transportation to the applicant.
5. A driver’s permit issued pursuant to this section is valid for
not longer than 3 years, but lapses if the driver ceases to be
employed by the carrier identified in the application for the original
or renewal permit or if the contract or lease expires and the driver
enters into a contract or lease with a different carrier. A driver must
notify the Authority within 10 days after the lapse of a permit and
-
*AB524*

– 5 –
obtain a new permit pursuant to this section before driving for a
different carrier.
[5.] 6. An applicant shall pay to the Authority:
(a) A fee for the processing of fingerprints which is to be
established by the Authority and which may not exceed the fee
charged by the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History and the Federal Bureau of Investigation for processing the
fingerprints.
(b) For an original driver’s permit, a fee not to exceed $50.
(c) For the renewal of a driver’s permit, a fee not to exceed $50.
[6.] 7. As used in this section, “charter bus transportation”
means transportation by bus of a group of persons who, pursuant to
a common purpose and under a single contract, at a fixed charge for
the motor vehicle, have acquired the exclusive use of the motor
vehicle to travel together under an itinerary either specified in
advance or modified after having left the place of origin. The term
does not include:
(a) The transportation of passengers and their baggage in the
same vehicle for a per capita charge between airports or between an
airport and points and places in this State;
(b) The transportation at a per capita or an hourly rate of
passengers to various points of interest for the purpose of
sightseeing or visiting those points of interest where a narrated tour
is presented to the passengers;
(c) The transportation of persons who have acquired the use of a
vehicle for a special event between definite points of origin and
destination, at a per capita rate; or
(d) In a county whose population is less than 100,000, the
transportation of a group of persons to and from a single job site or
work site, including, without limitation, a construction site, mine or
facility or project for the production of renewable energy. As used
in this paragraph:
(1) “Construction site” means any location at which
construction work is being commenced or in progress.
(2) “Mine” means an excavation in the earth from which
ores, coal or other mineral substances are extracted, or a
subterranean natural deposit of minerals located and identified as
such by the staking of a claim or other method recognized by law.
The term includes, without limitation, a well drilled to extract
minerals.
(3) “Renewable energy” means a source of energy that
occurs naturally or is regenerated naturally, including, without
limitation:
(I) Biomass;
(II) Fuel cells;
-
*AB524*

– 6 –
(III) Geothermal energy;
(IV) Solar energy;
(V) Waterpower; and
(VI) Wind.
 The term does not include coal, natural gas, oil, propane or any
other fossil fuel, or nuclear energy.
Sec. 5. NRS 706.186 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
706.186 Licensing of motor carriers by Department. The
Department shall license every common, contract and private motor
carrier required to be licensed by this chapter.
H
-
*AB524*